Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0872.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of
insurance and financial services for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 393.5
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 82,583,800
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 791,600
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 81,792,200
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 250,000
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 81,542,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 21.5
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,013,800
Administrative hearings 173,700
Department services--FTEs 16.0 8,684,900
Executive director programs--FTEs 5.5 1,527,100
Property management 1,318,700
Worker's compensation 1,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,719,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Special revenue funds:
Bank fees 959,200
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


Captive insurance regulatory and supervision
fund 82,700
Consumer finance fees 651,400
Credit union fees 1,488,200
Deferred presentment service transaction fees 282,400
Insurance bureau fund 5,746,500
Insurance continuing education fees 55,000
Insurance licensing and regulation fees 2,105,100
MBLSLA fund 1,348,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 103. INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES
REGULATION
Full-time equated classified positions 372.0
Consumer services and protection--FTEs 108.0 $ 18,604,400
Financial institutions evaluation--FTEs 132.0 24,966,000
Insurance evaluation--FTEs 132.0 22,413,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 65,983,700
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDLARA, for debt management 791,600
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 250,000
Special revenue funds:
Bank fees 6,734,300
Captive insurance regulatory and supervision
fund 656,500
Consumer finance fees 2,514,400
Credit union fees 8,696,100
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


Deferred presentment service transaction fees 3,786,900
Insurance bureau fund 27,495,000
Insurance continuing education fees 555,400
Insurance licensing and regulation fees 8,286,400
MBLSLA fund 6,181,600
Multiple employer welfare arrangement 35,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 104. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 3,630,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,630,700
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Special revenue funds:
Bank fees 289,400
Captive insurance regulatory and supervision
fund 23,300
Consumer finance fees 187,600
Credit union fees 438,200
Deferred presentment service transaction fees 80,900
Insurance bureau fund 1,717,800
Insurance continuing education fees 15,800
Insurance licensing and regulation fees 485,400
MBLSLA fund 392,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 105. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Non-drivers factors study $ 250,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 250,000
Appropriated from:
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


Special revenue funds:
Insurance bureau fund 250,000
Total other state restricted revenues 250,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$81,542,200.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00.
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of insurance and
financial services.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified
service of this state.
(d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(e) "MBLSLA fund" means the restricted account established
under section 8 of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers
licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1658.
(f) "MDLARA" means the Michigan department of licensing and
regulatory affairs.
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


(g) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on licensing and regulatory affairs
and insurance and financial services, the senate and house fiscal
agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget
office.
Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the
reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report
readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous years posted by fiscal
year in the same archivable location. The department or agency
shall also transmit all required reports for the current fiscal
year to the standard recipients and any other required recipients
by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare
a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1.
The report must list all travel by classified and unclassified
employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was
funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the
department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the senate and house
appropriations committees. The report must include the following
information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel
occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, local revenues, private revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program area. The state
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 209. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 210. The department shall cooperate with the department
of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable
website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following for the department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 211. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 212. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on
the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil
service classification, including a comparison by line item of the
number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds
appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated
positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting
period. The report must be submitted to the standard report
recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 215. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 216. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 217. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and
house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 218. The department must provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients detailing significant federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to, significantly impact the
operations of the department, including reductions in federal
revenue, changes, or both that are likely to lead to a reduction in
the department's ability to safeguard the health or welfare of the
public.
Sec. 219. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 220. (1) The department shall maximize the utilization of
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


its in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to civil service rules and
regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 222. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, a department or agency shall
submit an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts.
The report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


Sec. 223. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2026 are estimated at $6,514,000.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $5,875,200.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at
$638,800.00.
Sec. 224. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 225. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 226. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 228. (1) Not later than 30 days after the enactment of
this act, the house of representatives and senate shall provide to
the state budget office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively
directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in section 364
of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364. The list
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded
items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and
364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364 and
18.364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 229. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 230. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and the
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 231. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
Sec. 250. Unless prohibited by law, the department may accept
credit card or other electronic means of payment for licenses,
fees, or permits. Not later than February 1, the department shall
report on fees collected from credit card payments for licenses,
fees, and permits in the previous year.
Sec. 251. From the funds appropriated in part 1 from the
insurance bureau fund, funds may be expended to support legislative
participation in insurance activities coordinated by insurance and
legislative associations, in accordance with section 225 of the
insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.225. Not later than
February 1, the department shall report on funds expended to
support legislative participation in insurance activities
coordinated by insurance and legislative associations.

INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION
Sec. 301. The annual health insurance rate change report
prepared pursuant to 45 CFR 154.301(b) shall be transmitted
electronically to the standard report recipients and must include
the following:
(a) The number that are approved by the department.
(b) The number of denials issued by the department.
(c) The number of objections issued by the department.
(d) The percentage of rate filings processed within the
applicable statutory time frames.
(e) The average number of calendar days to process rate
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


filings.
Sec. 302. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
funds collected by the department in connection with a
conservatorship under section 32 of the mortgage brokers, lenders,
and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1682, and funds
collected by the department from corporations being liquidated
under the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.100 to
500.8302, must be appropriated for all expenses necessary to
provide for the required services. Funds are available for
expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury
and must not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal
year. The total amount appropriated under this section and section
303 must not exceed $600,000.00.
Sec. 303. The department may make available to interested
entities customized listings of nonconfidential information in its
possession. The department may establish and collect a reasonable
charge to provide this service. The revenue from this service is
appropriated when received and must be used to offset expenses to
provide the service. Any balance of this revenue collected and
unexpended at the end of the fiscal year must lapse to the
appropriate restricted fund. The total amount appropriated under
this section and section 302 must not exceed $600,000.00.
Sec. 306. (1) Not later than March 30, the department shall
provide a report to the standard report recipients and the
chairpersons of the senate and house standing committees that
address financial and insurance issues based on filings received
from insurers for automobile insurance, as that term is defined in
section 2102 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL
500.2102, in the previous calendar year that includes all of the
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


following:
(a) The number of automobile insurance rate filings received
by the department.
(b) The number of objections issued by the department for
automobile insurance rate filings.
(c) The average number of calendar days to process rate
filings.
(d) Pursuant to section 2111f of the insurance code of 1956,
1956 PA 218, MCL 500.2111f, the weighted average aggregated
personal protection insurance rate change for policies subject to
the coverage limits under section 3107c(1)(a) to (d) of the
insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3107c.
(e) Personal automobile insurance rating territories used in
Michigan.
(f) Number of rating territories used statewide and their
geographic boundaries.
(g) A map of the rating territories used statewide marking
their geographic boundaries.
(h) The range of base rates charged across each territory for
a standard coverage package, expressed as a ratio of highest to
lowest territory.
(i) For each territory, the following from publicly available
consensus data:
(i) The median household income.
(ii) The percentage of residents below the poverty line.
(iii) The racial and ethnic makeup of the territory.
(2) The department is not required to make any determination
regarding actuarial justification or legal compliance of territory
boundaries or rates.
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


Sec. 307. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
consumer services and protection, at least 1.0 FTE must provide
direct assistance in understanding automobile insurance coverage
and identifying available coverage options. Assistance must be
provided to households 300% of the federal poverty level or below.
The FTE must develop referral partnerships with not fewer than 10
community-based organizations serving low-income households.
(2) Not later than September 30, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients and the chairpersons of
the senate and house standing committees that provides all of the
following:
(a) The number of consumers assisted.
(b) The barriers encountered to obtaining coverage,
maintaining coverage, or both.
(c) The geographic distribution of need.
(d) The partner community organization.
(e) The legislative or departmental, or both, recommendations
based on barrier patterns identified.
(f) Average income level of those assisted.
Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for non-
driving factors study, by April 30, 2028, the department must
contract with a university or research institute that has a
specialty in automobile insurance research to conduct a study of
non-driving factors used in calculations or formulas in personal
automobile insurance rate setting. The contract must be established
through a competitive bidding process and the contract with a
university or research institute must not have any current or
previous relationship with automobile insurance companies. The
study must include the following:
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8


(a) A model of the impact of non-driving factors on personal
automobile insurance rate setting, including the use of these
embedded into rate or premium setting calculations and formulas.
(b) A model if each individual factor was removed as well as
if all factors were removed.
(c) The relationship of non-driving factors to uninsured
motorist numbers in the state.
(d) The relationship of uninsured motorists on statewide
rates.
(e) A comparison with other states and the impact on their
rates that have eliminated non-driving factors.
(f) A clear outline of methods and assumptions made in the
report.
(2) Non-driving factors that the report must study include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Credit scores or insurance scores.
(b) Gender or sex.
(c) Occupation.
(d) Income level.
(e) Geographic location.
(f) Age.
(g) Education level attained.
(h) Homeownership.
(i) Territories more impacted by the use of non-driving
factors.
Final Page
SCI S06109'26 (S-1) bv5zq8